Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 28.11 The Rhode Island Cannabis Act
21-28.11-18.
Enforcement.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, if the commission has cause to believe that a violation of any provision of chapters 21-28.6 or 21-28.11 or any regulations promulgated thereunder has occurred by a licensee that is under the commission’s jurisdiction pursuant to chapters 21-28.6 or 21-28.11, or that any person or entity is conducting any activities requiring licensure or registration by the commission under chapters 21-28.6 or 28.11 or the regulations promulgated thereunder without such licensure or registration, the commission may, in accordance with the requirements of the administrative procedures act, chapter 35 of title 42:

With the exception of patients and authorized purchasers, revoke or suspend a license or registration;

Levy an administrative penalty in an amount established pursuant to law or regulations promulgated by the cannabis control commission;

Order the violator to cease and desist such actions;

Require a licensee or registrant or person or entity conducting any activities requiring licensure or registration under chapters 21-28.6 or 21-28.11 to take such actions as are necessary to comply with such chapter and the regulations promulgated thereunder; or

Any combination of the penalties authorized by this section.

If the commission finds that emergency action imperative to public health, safety, or welfare is required, and incorporates a finding to that effect in its order, summary suspension of license or registration and/or cease and desist may be ordered pending proceedings for revocation or other action. Any such proceedings shall be promptly instituted and determined pursuant to the provisions of §

21-28.11-5(a)(32)

.

If a person exceeds the possession limits in violation of law or is in violation of any other section of chapters 21-28.6 or 21-28.11 or the regulations promulgated thereunder, he or she may also be subject to arrest and prosecution under chapter 28 of this title.

All cannabis establishment licensees are subject to inspection by the cannabis control commission, including, but not limited to, the licensed premises, all cannabis and cannabis products located on the licensed premises, personnel files, training materials, security footage, all business records and business documents including, but not limited to, purchase orders, transactions, sales, and any other financial records or financial statements whether located on the licensed premises or not.

All cannabis products that are held within the borders of this state in violation of the provisions of chapters 28.6 or 28.11 of this title or the regulations promulgated thereunder are declared to be contraband goods and may be seized by the commission, the tax administrator or his or her agents, or employees, or by any sheriff, or his or her deputy, or any police or other law enforcement officer in accordance with applicable law when requested by the tax administrator or cannabis control commission to do so, without a warrant. All contraband goods seized by the state under this chapter may be destroyed or saved as evidence for the purposes of criminal prosecution.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commission may make available to law enforcement and public safety personnel, any information that it may consider proper including information contained in licensing records, inspection reports and other reports and records maintained by the commission, as necessary or appropriate for purposes of ensuring compliance with state laws and regulations. Nothing in this act shall be construed to prohibit law enforcement, public safety, fire, or building officials from investigating violations of or enforcing state law.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 1, effective May 25, 2022.

21-28.11-18.1.
Cannabis office.

There is hereby established the “cannabis office”. The director of the department of business regulation shall grant to the cannabis office reasonable access to appropriate physical accommodations and expert and other appropriate staff.

Upon final issuance of the commission’s rules and regulations, whenever in the general laws, rules or regulations the term “office of cannabis regulation” appears, the term shall mean the “cannabis office” established pursuant to the provisions of this section.

The administrator of the cannabis office shall be appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate and shall be in the unclassified service.

The administrator of the cannabis office shall report to the commission, and consistent with the provisions of this chapter and in furtherance of coordinating the oversight and administration of cannabis use shall have the following powers, duties and responsibilities:

Exercise the powers and perform duties as directed and delegated by the commission in relation to the administration of the cannabis office, including, but not limited to, budgetary and fiscal matters;

Advise and assist the commission in carrying out any of the commission’s functions, powers, and duties;

As authorized by the commission, enter into contracts, memoranda of understanding, and agreements to effectuate the policy and purpose of this chapter;

Prescribe forms of applications for licenses under this chapter;

Prepare reports and information as deemed necessary by the commission;

Inspect or provide for inspections of any licensed premises where cannabis is cultivated, processed, stored, distributed or sold as directed or authorized by the commission;

Provide office accommodations, hearing rooms, and direct administrative and personnel support and staff to the commission in order to carry out the commission’s duties and responsibilities;

Maintain records of regulations, licenses, and permits issued and revoked by the commission in a manner that information is readily available regarding identity of licensees, including the names of officers and directors of corporate licensees and the location of all licensed premises;

Delegate the powers provided in this section to employees as may be deemed appropriate;

Coordinate across state agencies and departments to conduct research and to study cannabis use and the regulated cannabis industry and the impact access to cannabis products may have on public health and public safety;

Issue guidance and industry advisories;

Study the administration and alignment of cannabis regulation and as necessary make recommendations to the commission to improve administration;

As directed by the commission, coordinate with the staff designated by the respective directors of each state agency regarding adult use of cannabis, medical cannabis and industrial hemp with the objective of producing positive economic, public safety, and health outcomes for the state and its citizens;

As directed by the commission, offer guidance to and communicate with municipal officials regarding the implementation and enforcement of this chapter and chapter 28.6 of this title; and

As directed by the commission, communicate with regulatory officials from other states that allow cannabis for adult use and medical cannabis use, and benefit from the experiences of those states.

Subject to appropriation by the general assembly, the administrator of the cannabis office is authorized to retain and employ employees of the office of cannabis regulation as employees in the cannabis office who shall remain in the classified service. Any proposed new hires or additional staff or employees to be employed by the cannabis office shall be approved by the commission and shall be in the classified service. Any employees hired by the office of cannabis regulation after the enactment of this chapter and prior to the appointment of the commission shall be in the classified service.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 1, effective May 25, 2022.

21-28.11-19.
Multiple licenses restricted.

No person or entity licensed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter or chapter 28.6 of this title, except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, shall be granted more than one license.

No licensee shall own, control, manage or operate any other entity licensed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

Nothing in this chapter or chapter 28.6 of this title shall be construed to prohibit a compassion center licensed pursuant to the provisions of chapter 28.6 of this title from acquiring additional licensing issued to conduct retail sales as a hybrid cannabis retailer pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit one person from investing in multiple licensed entities under this chapter; provided no one person or entity shall be a majority owner in more than one licensed entity.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 1, effective May 25, 2022.

21-28.11-20.
Inspections, audits and investigations.

As a condition of licensure, cannabis establishments are subject to inspection by the commission or personnel designated by the commission. Inspections shall occur periodically, at reasonable times and shall be limited in scope to determine compliance with the provisions of this chapter and chapter 28.6 of this title and the rules and regulations promulgated by the commission. During inspections the commission or designated personnel may examine and inspect any premises, books, records, papers, stocks of cannabis or cannabis products.

The commission may request and authorize administrative inspections to be conducted by the department of health or the state police. For purposes of this section, “administrative inspection” shall mean any inspection, independent of a criminal investigation, that is conducted for the purpose of determining compliance with applicable state law and rules and regulations of the commission.

The tax administrator shall have authority to conduct inspections of all matters necessary to determine compliance with the provisions of this chapter and the provisions of title 44 (“taxation”).

Any licensee who wrongfully fails to cooperate with an inspection authorized pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment of up to one year, or a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation per day, or both, and revocation of a license.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 1, effective May 25, 2022.

21-28.11-21.
Expiration and renewal.

Except pursuant to §

21-28.11-10(e)

, all licenses under this chapter shall be effective for one year from the date of issuance.

Subject to rules and regulations, the commission shall issue a renewal license within thirty (30) days of receipt of a renewal application and renewal license fee from licensees in good standing as determined by the commission and who have filed all required tax returns and paid all required taxes.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 1, effective May 25, 2022.

21-28.11-22.
Personal use of cannabis.

Notwithstanding any other general or special law to the contrary, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a person twenty-one (21) years of age or older shall not be arrested, prosecuted, penalized, sanctioned or disqualified under the laws of the state in any manner, or denied any right or privilege and shall not be subject to seizure or forfeiture of assets for:

Possessing, using, purchasing from a licensed cannabis retailer, or processing one ounce (1 oz.) or less of cannabis, or the equivalent amount in the form of cannabis concentrate;

Within any residence, possessing, cultivating or processing not more than a total of three (3) mature cannabis plants and up to a total of three (3) immature cannabis plants per dwelling unit for personal use and as long as all security requirements as promulgated by the commission are complied with. These limits shall apply no matter how many persons reside at the premises;

Within the person’s primary residence, possessing up to ten ounces (10 oz.) total of cannabis per resident, in addition to any live cannabis plants lawfully kept on the premises in compliance with subsection (a)(2) of this section, as long as all security requirements as promulgated by the commission are complied with;

Assisting another person who is twenty-one (21) years of age or older in any of the acts described in this section; or

Giving away or otherwise transferring without remuneration up to one ounce (1 oz.) of cannabis, or the equivalent amount in the form of cannabis concentrate, to a person twenty-one (21) years of age or older, as long as the transfer is not advertised or promoted to the public.

Notwithstanding any other general or special law to the contrary, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a person shall not be arrested, prosecuted, penalized, sanctioned or otherwise denied any benefit and shall not be subject to seizure or forfeiture of assets for allowing property the person owns, occupies or manages to be used for any of the activities conducted lawfully under this chapter or for enrolling or employing a person who engages in cannabis-related activities lawfully under this chapter.

Absent clear and convincing evidence that the person’s actions related to cannabis have created an unreasonable danger to the safety of a minor child, neither the presence of cannabinoid components or metabolites in a person’s bodily fluids nor conduct permitted under this chapter related to the possession, consumption, transfer, cultivation, manufacture or sale of cannabis, cannabis products or cannabis accessories by a person charged with the well-being of a child shall form the sole or primary basis for substantiation, service plans, removal or termination or for denial of custody, visitation or any other parental right or responsibility.

The use of cannabis shall not disqualify a person from any needed medical procedure or treatment, including organ and tissue transplants.

Nothing contained within this chapter or chapter 28.6 of this title shall be construed as authorizing the smoking or vaporizing of cannabis in any public place. The smoking or vaporizing of cannabis is prohibited in any public place that prohibits the smoking or vaporizing of tobacco products as well as any place that prohibits the smoking or vaporizing of cannabis including by rule, regulation, or by local ordinance.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 1, effective May 25, 2022.

21-28.11-23.
Cannabis accessories authorized.

Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a person twenty-one (21) years of age or older shall not be arrested, prosecuted, penalized, sanctioned or disqualified and shall not be subject to seizure or forfeiture of assets for possessing, purchasing or otherwise obtaining or manufacturing cannabis accessories or for selling or otherwise transferring cannabis accessories to a person who is twenty-one (21) years of age or older.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 1, effective May 25, 2022.

21-28.11-24.
Lawful operation of cannabis establishments.

Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, except as otherwise provided in this chapter or in rules and regulations adopted pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, the following persons involved in the distribution of cannabis as authorized by this chapter shall not be arrested, prosecuted, penalized, sanctioned or disqualified and shall not be subject to seizure or forfeiture of assets for activities specified for:

A cannabis retailer or hybrid cannabis retailer or an owner, operator, employee or other agent acting on behalf thereof possessing cannabis or cannabis products, purchasing, selling or otherwise transferring or delivering cannabis or cannabis products to or from a cannabis establishment; or selling or otherwise transferring or delivering cannabis or cannabis products to a consumer;

A cannabis cultivator or an owner, operator, employee or other agent acting on behalf of a cannabis cultivator cultivating, propagating, breeding, harvesting, processing, packaging, storing or possessing cannabis or cannabis products, or selling or otherwise transferring, purchasing or delivering cannabis and cannabis products to or from a cannabis establishment;

A cannabis product manufacturer or an owner, operator, employee or other agent acting on behalf of a cannabis product manufacturer packaging, processing, manufacturing, storing or possessing cannabis or cannabis products, or delivering, selling or otherwise transferring and purchasing cannabis or cannabis products to or from a cannabis establishment; or

A cannabis testing laboratory or an owner, operator, employee or other agent acting on behalf of a cannabis testing laboratory possessing, processing, storing, transferring or testing cannabis or cannabis products.

Any licensee, or agent or employee thereof, under this chapter who reasonably relies on a valid state issued identification card, or on a valid motor vehicle license, or on a valid passport issued by the United States government, or by the government of a foreign country recognized by the United States government, or a valid United States issued military identification card, for proof of a person’s identity and age shall not suffer any modification, suspension, revocation or cancellation of such license, nor shall the licensee, agent or employee suffer any criminal liability, for delivering or selling cannabis or cannabis products to a person under twenty-one (21) years of age. Any licensee, or agent or employee thereof, under this chapter, who reasonably relies on the forms of identification listed in this subsection, for proof of a person’s identity and age, shall be presumed to have exercised due care in making such delivery or sale of cannabis or cannabis products to a person under twenty-one (21) years of age. Such presumption shall be rebuttable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 1, effective May 25, 2022.

21-28.11-25.
Contracts pertaining to cannabis enforceable.

It is the public policy of the state that contracts related to the operation of cannabis establishments under this chapter shall be enforceable. A contract entered into by a licensee or its agents as permitted pursuant to a valid license issued by the commission, or by those who allow property to be used by a licensee or its agents as permitted pursuant to a valid license issued by the commission, shall not be unenforceable or void exclusively because the actions or conduct permitted pursuant to the license is prohibited by federal law.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 1, effective May 25, 2022.

21-28.11-26.
Provision of professional services.

A person engaged in a profession or occupation subject to licensure shall not be subject to disciplinary action by a professional licensing board solely for providing professional services to prospective or licensed cannabis establishments related to activity under this chapter that is not subject to criminal penalty under the laws of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 1, effective May 25, 2022.

21-28.11-27.
Penalties.

Every person who engages in any activity regulated by this chapter without a license or registration required by the provisions of this chapter may be prosecuted and punished pursuant to the provisions of chapter 28 of this title (the “uniform controlled substances act”) or other applicable law.

Every person who engages in any activity in violation of §

21-28.11-22

may be prosecuted and punished pursuant to the provisions of chapter 28 of this title (the uniform controlled substances act).

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, any person licensed pursuant to this chapter or acting as an agent for an entity licensed pursuant to this chapter shall be guilty of a felony and may be imprisoned not more than five (5) years and fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both and shall forfeit any licenses pursuant to this chapter if that person knowingly and willfully:

By fraud, deceit, or misrepresentation or subterfuge materially omits or falsifies any information related to: (i) The application for a license or renewal of a license to be issued pursuant to this chapter; or (ii) Any report, notice or filing required to be submitted to the commission, the cannabis office, the tax administrator or the department of revenue; or

Knowingly and willfully transfers cannabis to a minor in violation of the provisions of this chapter and chapter 28.6 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 1, effective May 25, 2022.

21-28.11-27.1.
No minors on the premises of marijuana establishments.

A cannabis establishment shall not allow any person who is under twenty-one (21) years of age to be present inside any room where cannabis or cannabis products are stored, produced, or sold by the cannabis establishment unless the person who is under twenty-one (21) years of age is:

A government employee performing their official duties; or

If the cannabis establishment is a hybrid cannabis retailer that also holds a compassion center license pursuant §

21-28.6-12

for the same licensed premises and the individual under twenty-one (21) years of age is a qualifying patient registered under chapter 28.6 of this title and the retail establishment complies with applicable regulations promulgated by the commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 1, effective May 25, 2022.

21-28.11-27.2.
Drug awareness program.

The department of behavioral healthcare, development disabilities and hospitals (BHDDH) shall develop substance abuse prevention programs and student assistance programs for youth pursuant to chapters 21.2 and 21.3 of title 16, and in accordance with the criteria set forth in §§

16-21.2-4(a)

and

16-21.3-2(a)

. The drug awareness program shall provide at least four (4) hours of classroom instruction or group discussion and ten (10) hours of community service.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 1, effective May 25, 2022.

21-28.11-28.
Liability to state under this chapter as debt.

Any liability to the state under this chapter shall constitute a debt to the state. Once a statement of debt naming a licensee is recorded, registered or filed, any such debt shall constitute a lien on all commercial property owned by a licensee in the state and shall have priority over an encumbrance recorded, registered or filed with respect to any site.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 1, effective May 25, 2022.

21-28.11-29.
Prohibited activities.

This chapter shall not permit:

Any person to undertake any task under the influence of cannabis when doing so would constitute negligence or professional malpractice;

The smoking or vaporizing of cannabis:

In a school bus or other form of public transportation;

On any school grounds;

In any correctional facility;

In any public place or other place where smoking or vaporizing of tobacco is prohibited by federal or state law or by local ordinance;

In any licensed drug treatment facility in this state; or

Where exposure to the cannabis smoke significantly adversely affects the health, safety, or welfare of children; or

Any person to operate, navigate, or be in actual physical control of any motor vehicle, aircraft, or motorboat while under the influence of cannabis. However, a person shall not be considered to be under the influence solely for having cannabis metabolites in his or her system.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require:

A government medical assistance program or private health insurer or workers’ compensation insurer, workers’ compensation group self-insurer, or employer self-insured for workers’ compensation under §

28-36-1

to reimburse a person for costs associated with the medical use of cannabis; or

An employer to accommodate the medical use of marijuana in any workplace.

Fraudulent representation to a law enforcement official of any fact or circumstance relating to the medical use of marijuana to avoid arrest or prosecution shall be punishable by a fine of five hundred dollars ($500) which shall be in addition to any other penalties that may apply for making a false statement for the nonmedical use of cannabis.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to require employers to accommodate the use or possession of cannabis, or being under the influence of cannabis, in any workplace or the use of cannabis in any other location while an employee is performing work, including remote work. Employers may implement drug use policies which prohibit the use or possession of cannabis in the workplace or while performing work from being under the influence of cannabis, provided that unless such use is prohibited pursuant to the terms of a collective bargaining agreement, an employer shall not fire or take disciplinary action against an employee solely for an employee’s private, lawful use of cannabis outside the workplace and as long as the employee has not and is not working under the influence of cannabis except to the extent that:

The employer is a federal contractor or otherwise subject to federal law or regulations such that failure to take such action would cause the employer to lose a monetary or licensing related benefit thereunder; or

The employee is employed in a job, occupation or profession that is hazardous, dangerous or essential to public welfare and safety. If the employee’s job, occupation or profession involves work that is hazardous, dangerous or essential to public welfare and safety then the employer may adopt and implement policies which prohibit the use or consumption of cannabis within the twenty-four (24) hour period prior to a scheduled work shift or assignment. For purposes of this section, hazardous, dangerous or essential to public welfare and safety shall include, but not be limited to: operation of an aircraft, watercraft, heavy equipment, heavy machinery, commercial vehicles, school buses or public transportation; use of explosives; public safety first responder jobs; and emergency and surgical medical personnel.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall prevent an employer from refusing to hire, discharging, disciplining, or otherwise taking an adverse employment action against a person with respect to hire, tenure, terms, conditions, or privileges of employment because of that person’s violation of a workplace drug policy or because that person was working while under the influence of cannabis.

The provisions of this chapter do not exempt any person from arrest, civil or criminal penalty, seizure or forfeiture of assets, discipline by any state or local licensing board or authority, and state prosecution for, nor may they establish an affirmative defense based on this chapter to charges arising from, any of the following acts:

Driving, operating, or being in actual physical control of a vehicle or a vessel under power or sail while impaired by cannabis or cannabis products;

Possessing or using cannabis or cannabis products if the person is in state custody;

Possessing or using cannabis or cannabis products in any local detention facility, jail, state prison, reformatory, or other correctional facility, including, without limitation, any facility for the detention of juvenile offenders;

Manufacturing or processing of cannabis products with the use of prohibited solvents, in violation of this chapter and chapter 28.6 of this title; or

Possessing, using, distributing, cultivating, processing or manufacturing cannabis or cannabis products which do not satisfy the requirements of this chapter and chapter 28.6 of this title.

Except as provided in this section, the provisions of this chapter do not require any person, corporation, state department or any other entity that occupies, owns, or controls a property to allow the consumption, or transfer of marijuana on or in that property.

Except as provided in this section, in the case of the rental of a residential dwelling unit governed by chapter 18 of title 34, a landlord may not prohibit the consumption of cannabis by non-smoked or non-vaporized means, or the transfer without compensation of cannabis by the tenant as defined in §

34-18-11

, provided the tenant is in compliance with the possession and transfer limits and other requirements set forth in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 1, effective May 25, 2022.

21-28.11-30.
Employer’s duties.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to preempt or limit the duties of any employer under applicable law, or shall permit an employer to require an employee to disclose sealed or expunged offenses, unless otherwise required by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 1, effective May 25, 2022.

21-28.11-31.
Social equity assistance program and fund.

Findings. The general assembly finds that additional efforts are needed to reduce barriers to ownership and/or participation in the cannabis industry for individuals and communities most adversely impacted by the enforcement of cannabis-related laws.

In the interest of establishing a legal cannabis industry that is equitable and accessible to those most adversely impacted by the enforcement of cannabis-related laws, the general assembly finds and declares that a social equity program should be established.

The general assembly also finds and declares that individuals who have been arrested or incarcerated due to cannabis related laws suffer long-lasting negative consequences, including impacts to employment, business ownership, housing, health, and long-term financial well-being.

The general assembly also finds and declares that family members, especially children, and communities of those who have been arrested or incarcerated due to cannabis related laws, suffer from emotional, psychological, and financial harms as a result of such arrests or incarcerations.

Furthermore, the general assembly finds and declares that certain communities have disproportionately suffered the harms of enforcement of cannabis-related laws. Those communities face greater difficulties accessing capital to finance the start-up costs for cannabis establishments.

The general assembly also finds that individuals who have resided in areas of high poverty suffer negative consequences, including barriers to entry in employment, business ownership, housing, health, and long-term financial well-being.

The general assembly also finds and declares that promotion of business ownership by individuals who have resided in areas of high poverty and high enforcement of cannabis-related laws furthers a more equitable cannabis industry.

Therefore, in the interest of mitigating the harms resulting from the enforcement of cannabis-related laws, the general assembly finds and declares that a social equity program should offer, among other things, business assistance and license application benefits to individuals most directly and adversely impacted by the enforcement of cannabis-related laws who are interested in establishing or participating in a cannabis business entity.

There is created in the state treasury within the general fund, a fund which shall be held separate and apart from all other state monies, to be known as the social equity assistance fund. The social equity assistance fund, subject to appropriation, shall be exclusively used for the following purposes:

To provide grants to approved social equity applicants to pay for ordinary and necessary expenses to establish and/or operate a cannabis establishment, and to also further promote the goals of this chapter, including without limitation, job training and workforce development, mentoring services and technical assistance;

To support the waiver or reduction of application and licensing fees pursuant to this section for social equity applicants; and

To implement and administer programming for restorative justice, jail diversion, drug rehabilitation and education workforce development for jobs related to cannabis cultivation, transportation, distribution and sales.

The social equity assistance fund shall be subject to appropriation. The fund shall consist of all monies received on account of the state as a result of application for, and licensing of, individuals and entities pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, exclusive of licensing fees paid pursuant to the provisions of chapter 28.6 of this title. Additionally, except as otherwise provided, the fund shall consist of all administrative penalties received for violations of this chapter, except tax violations and interest earned on balances in the fund.

The commission shall administer the social equity assistance fund and the authorized disbursement of funds, as appropriated by the general assembly. In consultation with the cannabis advisory board, the commission shall promulgate rules and regulations establishing the criteria, eligibility, qualifications and process for administering the disbursement of funds from the social equity assistance fund.

Reporting. Beginning September 1, 2023, and each year thereafter, the commission shall annually report to the governor and the general assembly on the outcomes and effectiveness of this section that shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

The number of persons or businesses receiving assistance under this section;

The amount in financial assistance awarded in the aggregate, in addition to the amount of grants awarded; and

If applicable, the number of new jobs and other forms of economic impact created as a result of assistance from the social equity assistance fund.

Fee waivers.

For social equity applicants as defined in §

21-28.11-3

, the commission may waive up to one hundred percent (100%) of any nonrefundable license application fees or any nonrefundable fees associated with acquiring a license to operate a cannabis establishment, pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the commission in consultation with the cannabis advisory board.

If the commission determines that an applicant who applied as a social equity applicant is not eligible for social equity status, the applicant shall be provided an additional ten (10) days to provide alternative evidence that the applicant qualifies as a social equity applicant. Alternatively, the applicant may pay all required fees and be considered as a non-social equity applicant. If the applicant cannot do either, then any application fee shall be returned and the application process shall be terminated.

Transfers of cannabis establishment licenses awarded to a social equity applicant are subject to all other provisions of this chapter, and applicable law; provided however, that a license issued to a social equity applicant shall only be transferred to another qualified social equity applicant as determined and approved by the commission.

Reporting.

By September 1, 2023, and on the first day of September of every year thereafter, or upon request by the commission, each cannabis establishment licensed under this chapter and §

21-28.6-12

(“The Edward O. Hawkins and Thomas C. Slater Medical Marijuana Act”) shall report to the commission, on a form to be provided by the commission, information that will allow it to assess the extent of diversity in the medical and adult use cannabis industry and methods for further reducing or eliminating any identified barriers to entry, including without limitation, access to capital.

Failure of a cannabis establishment to respond to the request of the commission to complete the form, report, and any other request for information may be grounds for disciplinary action by the commission pursuant to this chapter. The information to be collected shall identify, without limitation, the following:

The number and percentage of licenses provided to social equity applicants;

The total number and percentage of employees in the cannabis industry who meet the criteria in the definition of social equity applicant; and

Recommendations on reducing or eliminating any identified barriers to entry, including access to capital, in the cannabis industry.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 1, effective May 25, 2022.

21-28.11-32.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or its application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter, which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 1, effective May 25, 2022.